Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.180

License renewal.

Every person licensed to practice dentistry in this state shall renew his or her license and comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, continuing education requirements, and fees as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. The commission, in its sole discretion, may permit the applicant to be licensed without examination, and with or without conditions, if it is satisfied that the applicant meets all the requirements for licensure in this state and is competent to engage in the practice of dentistry.

[ 1999 c 364 s 3; 1996 c 191 s 16; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 216; 1991 c 3 s 67; 1989 c 202 s 22; 1985 c 7 s 26; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 30; 1969 c 49 s 3; 1951 c 130 s 4; 1935 c 112 s 24; RRS s 10031-24.]

NOTES:

Application—1999 c 364: "The continuing education requirements of RCW 18.32.180 apply to licenses renewed after July 1, 2001." [ 1999 c 364 s 4.]